Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1109
General supervision, defined.

General supervision means the directing of the authorized activities of a dental hygienist or dental assistant by a licensed dentist and shall not be construed to require the physical presence of the supervisor when directing such activities.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 442.